Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Chapter 7 Visitation Rights

§ 20-7-101.
Establishing grandparents' visitation rights.

A grandparent may bring an original action against any person having custody of the grandparent’s minor grandchild to establish reasonable visitation rights to the child. If the court finds, after a hearing, that visitation would be in the best interest of the child and that the rights of the child’s parents are not substantially impaired, the court shall grant reasonable visitation rights to the grandparent. In any action under this section for which the court appoints a guardian ad litem, the grandparent shall be responsible for all fees and expenses associated with the appointment.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 71, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 71, § 2.

No action to establish visitation rights may be brought by a grandparent under subsection (a) of this section if the minor grandchild has been adopted and neither adopting parent is related by blood to the child.

In any action or proceeding in which visitation rights have been granted to a grandparent under this section, the court may for good cause upon petition of the person having custody or who is the guardian of the child, revoke or amend the visitation rights granted to the grandparent.

As used in this section:

“Grandparent” includes a great-grandparent; and

“Grandchild” includes a great-grandchild.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 119, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 20-6-701; Laws 1995, ch. 41, § 1; 1997, ch. 71, §§ 1, 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2; 2007, ch. 60, § 1; ch. 127, § 1.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, added (e).

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “related by blood to” for “a natural parent of” in (c).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect as set out in this section.

Editor's notes. —

Although Laws 1991, ch. 119, § 1, enacted this section as § 20-6-701, it was apparently intended to be enacted as §

20-7-101

.

Denial of grandparents' petition. —

Denial of the grandparents’ petition to establish visitation was affirmed because the parents established the four younger children did not have a history of regular contact with the grandparents outside the parents’ presence and the grandparents did not meet their burden of establishing the parents were unfit or made visitation decisions harmful to the children. Ailport v. Ailport, 2022 WY 43, 507 P.3d 427,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2022).

Constitutionality. —

This section is not an unconstitutional infringement on the fundamental right of a parent to rear his or her children without undue governmental interference, since the state has a compelling state interest in protecting the best interests of children and in maintaining the right of association of grandparents and grandchildren. Michael v. Hertzler, 900 P.2d 1144,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1995).

Stepparents and siblings do not have standing. —

Petition to set aside the modification of a custody order granting custody to a father was dismissed because a stepfather and a sibling have no standing to pursue such an action by way of statutes or common law due to the fundamental right to care and control held by the parents. The only persons allowed to pursue such an action are grandparents and primary caregivers. MBB v. ERW, 2004 WY 134, 100 P.3d 415,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2004).

Mother lacked standing to assert grandfather's right to visitation. —

Although the child's mother might be concerned about preserving a relationship between the child and her family, she did not have a personal interest in the grandfather's petition for visitation under this section. The mother, therefore, did not have standing to claim that the district court erred by failing to grant the grandfather visitation with the child or to argue that the grandfather's right to familial association was deprived by the district court's order. TF v. Dep't of Family Serv. (In re CF), 2005 WY 118, 120 P.3d 992,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2005).

Visitation rights after adoption. —

Because the legislature did not provide that paternal grandparent visitation rights survived the adoption of their grandchild by the child's maternal grandparents, such visitation rights were limited and terminable without notice, and therefore did not rise to the magnitude of constitutionally protected liberty interests. The adoption statutes extinguished all legal relationships between the adopted child and his biological family. Hede v. Gilstrap, 2005 WY 24, 107 P.3d 158,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2005).

Visitation rights against custodial parent. —

This section extends to affording rights of visitation to grandparents when the custodial parent is the grandparents' own natural child. Goff v. Goff, 844 P.2d 1087,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1993).

Right of parent of adopting parent. —

The parents of a parent who has adopted children have standing to petition for grandparent visitation under this section. Michael v. Hertzler, 900 P.2d 1144,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

Fergusson v. Fergusson, 2002 WY 66, 45 P.3d 641,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For case notes, “Constitutional Law — Family Law — Grandparent Visitation Rights — Constitutional Considerations and the Need to Define the “Best Interest of the Child”
Goff v. Goff, 844 P.2d 1087,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1993),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Grandparents' visitation rights where child's parents are deceased, or where status of parents is unspecified, 69 ALR5th 1.

Grandparents' visitation rights where child's parents are living, 71 ALR5th 99.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice § 32.09 (Matthew Bender).

§ 20-7-102.
Establishing primary caregivers' visitation rights.

With notice or reasonable efforts to provide notice to the noncustodial parent, a person may bring an original action against any person having custody of the child to establish reasonable visitation rights to the child if the person bringing the original action has been the primary caregiver for the child for a period of not less than six (6) months within the previous eighteen (18) months. If the court finds, after a hearing, that visitation would be in the best interest of the child and that the rights of the child’s parents are not substantially impaired, the court shall grant reasonable visitation rights to the primary caregiver. In any action under this section for which the court appoints a guardian ad litem, the person bringing the original action under this section shall be responsible for all fees and expenses associated with the appointment.

No action to establish visitation rights under subsection (a) of this section may be brought by a person related to the child by blood or by a person acting as primary caregiver for the child prior to the adoption of the minor child when neither adopting parent is related by blood to the child.

In any action or proceeding in which visitation rights have been granted to a primary caregiver under this section, the court may for good cause upon petition of the person having custody or who is the guardian of the child, revoke or amend the visitation rights granted to the primary caregiver.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 119, § 1.

Stepparents and siblings do not have standing. —

Petition to set aside the modification of a custody order granting custody to a father was dismissed because a stepfather and a sibling have no standing to pursue such an action by way of statutes or common law due to the fundamental right to care and control held by the parents. The only persons allowed to pursue such an action are grandparents and primary caregivers. MBB v. ERW, 2004 WY 134, 100 P.3d 415,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2004).